District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.02

No liability as director for limited cooperative association’s obligations.

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association shall be solely that of the association and shall not be a debt, obligation, or liability of a director solely by reason of being a director. An individual shall not be personally liable, directly or indirectly, for an obligation of an association solely by reason of being a director.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 802 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition